Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-469
Onsite vaccinations for diphtheria,
tetanus, and pertussis.

In
order to prevent, detect, and control diphtheria, tetanus, and pertussis in
Nebraska, each general acute hospital, intermediate care facility, nursing
facility, and skilled nursing facility shall offer onsite vaccinations for
diphtheria, tetanus, and pertussis to all residents and to all inpatients
prior to discharge, pursuant to procedures of the facility and in accordance
with the recommendations of the advisory committee on immunization practices
of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention of the United States Public
Health Service of the United States Department of Health and Human Services
as the recommendations existed on January 1, 2013. Nothing in this section
shall be construed to require any facility listed in this section to bear
the cost of a vaccination provided pursuant to this section.

Laws 2013, LB459, § 2.
September 6, 2013